Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 1 General Provisions

20-1-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that the animal life inhabiting the lands of the state, its lakes, ponds, streams, and rivers, and the marine waters within its territorial jurisdiction, are a precious, renewable, natural resource of the state that, through application of enlightened management techniques, can be developed, preserved, and maintained for the beauty and mystery that wild animals bring to our environment.

The general assembly further finds that the management of fish and wildlife through the establishment of hunting and fishing seasons; the setting of size, catch, possession, and bag limits; the regulation of the manner of hunting and fishing; and the establishment of conservation policies should be pursued utilizing modern scientific techniques, having regard for the fluctuations of species populations, the effect of management practices on fish and wildlife, and the conservation and perpetuation of all species of fish and wildlife.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-2.
Authority over fish and wildlife.

The general assembly hereby vests in the director of the department of environmental management authority and responsibility over the fish and wildlife of the state and over the fish, lobsters, shellfish, and other biological resources of marine waters of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 304, § 1.

20-1-3.
Definitions.

When used in this title, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings, unless the context indicates another meaning:

“Bushel” means a standard U.S. bushel, 2,150.4 cubic inches capacity;

“Commercial fishing” means to take, harvest, hold, transport, load, or off-load, marine species for sale or for intended sale;

“Hinge width” means the distance between the convex apex of the right shell and the convex apex of the left shell;

“Land or landing” means to off-load seafood products, including, but not limited to, finfish, shellfish, and crustaceans, for sale or intended sale, or to secure a vessel with the seafood products on board to a shoreside facility where the products may be off-loaded for sale or intended sale;

“Nonresident landowner” means a nonresident citizen of the United States and owner of real estate in Rhode Island as evidenced by deed filed in the recorder of deeds office in a Rhode Island town or city hall;

“Peck” means one fourth (1/4) of a bushel;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity;

“Possession” means the exercise of dominion or control over the resource commencing at the time at which a decision is made not to return the resource to the immediate vicinity from which it was taken. The decision must be made at the first practical opportunity. In the case of aquaculture crops, “possession” means the exercise of dominion or control over cultured crops commencing at the time that a decision is made not to return the crops to the lease or facility from which they were taken. The decision must be made at the first practical opportunity, taking into consideration the management practices set forth in the approved operational plan;

“Quart” means one thirty-second (1/32) of a bushel;

“Resident” means an individual who has had his or her actual place of residence and has lived in the state of Rhode Island for a continuous period of not less than six (6) months.

When used in this title, the following common names shall mean the animals designated by the following scientific names:

Alewife —
Pomolobus
or

Alosa pseudoharengus

Bay quahaug —
Mercenaria mercenaria

Bay scallop —
Argopecten irradians

Blue crab —
Callinectes sapidus

Blue mussel —
Mytilus edulis

Conch/channel whelk —
Busycon canaliculatum

Conch/nob whelk —
Busycon carica

Deer — white-tailed deer,
Odocoileous virginianus

Eel —
Anguilla rostrata

Green crabs —
Carcinus maenas

Jonah/northern crab —
Cancer borealis

Lobster —
Homarus americanus

Menhaden —
Brevoortia tyrannus

Ocean quahaug —
Arctica islandica

Oyster —
Crassostrea virginica, Ostrea edulis

Rock crab —
Cancer irroratus

Sea scallop —
Placopecten magellanicus

Smelt —
Osmerus mordax

Soft shell clam —
Mya arenaria

Striped bass —
Morone saxatilis

Surf clam or sea clam —
Spisula solidissima.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 1.

20-1-4.
Rules and regulations.

The director is authorized to promulgate, adopt, and enforce any and all rules and regulations deemed necessary to carry out duties and responsibilities under this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-5.
General enforcement powers.

The director, and the director’s authorized agents, employees, and designees, shall protect the wild birds, wild animals, fisheries, and shellfisheries throughout the state and shall administer and enforce the provisions of this title, and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this title, and shall prosecute violations of these laws and rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-5.1.
Advice of the marine fisheries council.

The director, in exercising authority under this title for the planning, management, and regulation of marine fisheries, shall request and consider in the record as applicable the advice of the marine fisheries council, and in the adoption of management plans and regulations affecting licensing for marine fisheries, the director shall provide a written response to the advice of the marine fisheries council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 359, § 1.

20-1-6.
Appointment and delegation of powers to conservation officers.

The director shall appoint any number of conservation officers that he or she may deem necessary for the detection and prosecution of any violations of the laws of this state enumerated in §

20-1-8

. The director may delegate any and all of his or her powers and duties to each of these conservation officers who shall serve at the director’s pleasure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-7.
Deputy wardens.

The director may appoint any number of deputy wardens that he or she may deem necessary. The deputy wardens shall not be authorized to carry pistols or revolvers, but shall be authorized to detect violators of the laws of this state enumerated in §

20-1-8

. This detection shall be reported to the director who may proceed with the prosecution. Deputy wardens shall be given an identification badge by the director and shall serve at the director’s pleasure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-8.
Enforcement powers of director and conservation officers.

The director and each conservation officer shall have the power:

To enforce all laws, rules, and regulations of this state pertaining to:

Fish, wildlife, and all vertebrates, invertebrates, and plants;

Freshwater wetlands, dams, and resources;

Areas and activities subject to the jurisdiction of the coastal resources management council;

State parks, reservations, management areas, hatcheries, game preserves, any law of the state within state parks, lands cooperatively managed, facilities that host official department events, and properties leased by the department;

Solid and hazardous waste transportation, storage, and disposal and any other laws of the state regarding solid and/or hazardous wastes;

Boating safety, water safety, and drowning prevention;

Water and air pollution and open burning;

Firearms;

Littering;

Trees and forests, forestry, and protection of forests from fire hazards and trespass;

Agriculture, farmland, and pest control; and

All-terrain vehicles, as defined in §

31-3.2-1(8)

.

To issue summonses and to execute all warrants and search warrants for the violation of the laws, rules, and regulations enumerated in subsections (a)(1) or (a)(9);

To serve subpoenas issued for the trial or hearing of all offenses against the law, rules, and regulations enumerated in subsections (a)(1) or (a)(9);

To arrest, without a warrant, any person found violating any law, rule, or regulation enumerated in subsection (a)(1), take that person before a court of competent jurisdiction, and detain that person in custody at the expense of the state until arraignment, except when a summons can be issued in accordance with §

12-7-11

;

To seize and take possession of all fish, shellfish, crustaceans, marine mammals, amphibians, reptiles, birds, and mammals in possession, or under control of, any person or that have been shipped, or are about to be shipped, at any time, in any manner, or for any purpose contrary to the laws of this state, and dispose of them at the discretion of the director;

To seize all fishing tackle, firearms, shooting and hunting paraphernalia, hunting, fishing, or trapping licenses, traps, decoys, tongs, bullrakes, dredges, or other implements or appliances used in violation of any law, rule, or regulation relating to fish, shellfish, crustaceans, marine mammals, amphibians, reptiles, birds, and mammals, or any equipment, materials, tools, implements, samples of substances, or any other item used in the violation of any other law, rule, or regulation enumerated in subsection (a)(9), when making an arrest as found in the execution of a search warrant, and hold the seized item or items at the owner’s expense until the fine and costs imposed for the violation have been paid in full;

To go on board any boat or vessel engaged, or believed to be engaged, in fishing and examine any fishing, shellfish, scallop, lobster, multipurpose, or other license issued under this title;

To go on board any boat or vessel engaged, or believed to be engaged, in fishing and to inspect that boat or vessel for compliance with the provisions of this title and any rules relative to the taking of fish, shellfish, crustaceans, marine mammals, amphibians, and reptiles. In the absence of probable cause to believe that a crime relative to the taking of these marine species has been, or is being, committed, any evidence obtained as the result of a boarding (other than for the purpose of examining a license) or of an inspection may not be used in a criminal prosecution;

To carry firearms or other weapons, concealed or otherwise, in the course of, and in performance of, the duties of office; and

To arrest without a warrant, to execute all warrants and search warrants, and to make and execute complaints within any district to the justice or clerk of the district court without recognizance or surety against any person for the following criminal offenses:

Assault;

Assault with a dangerous weapon;

Larceny;

Vandalism;

Obstructing officer in execution of duty.

Conservation officers shall be deemed “officer” within the meaning of §

11-32-1

.

It shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both, for any person to refuse to move or to stop on an oral command or order of a conservation officer when the officer is acting in the performance of the officer’s duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 30; P.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 460, § 1.

20-1-8.1.
Procedures for seizure and forfeiture.

Any vessel, boat, fishing tackle, guns, shooting and hunting paraphernalia, traps, decoys, or any other implements, appliances, or equipment used in violation of any law, rule, or regulation relating to fish and wildlife, that, by provision of any section of this title, is subject to forfeiture to the state, shall be seized pursuant to §

20-1-8(a)(6)

and forfeited under the provisions of this section.

The attorney general shall proceed pursuant to §§

12-21-23

—

12-21-32

, to show cause why the vessel, boat, fishing tackle, guns, shooting and hunting paraphernalia, traps, decoys, or any other implements, appliances, or equipment used in the knowing and willful violation of any law, rule, or regulation relating to fish and wildlife that, by provision of any section of this title, is subject to forfeiture to the state, may be forfeited to the use of or the sale of the department on producing due proof that the vessel, fishing tackle, guns, shooting and hunting paraphernalia, traps, decoys, or any other implements, appliances, or equipment was used in this violation.

Whenever property is forfeited under this section and the specific provision of this title requiring forfeiture for a particular offense, the department may:

Retain the property for official use; or

Sell any forfeited property that is not required by this title to be destroyed and that is not harmful to the public; but the proceeds of this sale, after first deducting the amount sufficient for all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, and advertising and court costs, shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-9.
Operation of patrol boats.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to patrol and police the shellfish grounds; check the licenses of fishermen; protect the scallop areas; collect animal specimens; execute special work incidental to the lobster and other shellfisheries; and enforce the provisions of chapter 22 of title 46, this sum to be expended under the direction of the director of the department of environmental management for the purpose of maintaining and operating patrol boats and their crews. The controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or sums, as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 23.

20-1-10.
Obligation of vessels to heave-to on command of a patrol boat.

Every person operating a boat or vessel in Rhode Island territorial waters who fails to immediately heave-to upon a shouted command or a flare fired into the air from a marine patrol boat operated by the department of environmental management and carrying the identification “Department of Environmental Management, State of Rhode Island” shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Every person who, while aboard a boat or vessel in Rhode Island territorial waters that has been ordered to heave-to upon shouted command or a flare fired into the air from a marine patrol boat operated by the department of environmental management and carrying the identification “Department of Environmental Management, State of Rhode Island”, dumps, destroys, or throws anything from the vessel or boat shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-11.
Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general to conduct the prosecution of all court proceedings brought by the director as requested by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-12.
Fixing of seasons and bag limits.

The director is authorized to adopt regulations fixing seasons, bag limits, size limits, possession limits, and methods of taking on any species of fish, game, bird, or other wild animal occurring within the state, other than marine species regulated by the marine fisheries council.

These regulations may prohibit the taking, holding, or possession of any species; prohibit the taking, molestation, or disturbance in any way of nesting, breeding, or feeding sites of any species; and/or prohibit, control, or regulate any commercial use, importation into the state, or exportation from the state of any species.

These regulations may be of statewide applicability or may be applicable in any specified locality, or localities, within the state when the director shall find, after investigation, that the regulations are appropriate.

Any person who violates any provision of this section, or any rule or regulation made under the provisions of this section, shall be guilty of a civil violation and subject to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the traffic tribunal shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all violations specified in this section.

The regulations shall be adopted only after the holding of a public hearing subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 253, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 294, § 3.

20-1-12.1.
Modifications to possession limits and seasons for marine species managed under quotas.

In accordance with regulatory programs promulgated pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42; and pursuant to the exemption afforded by §

42-35-18(b)(5)

; and notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 35.1 of title 42, the director shall have the authority to modify possession limits and seasons in order to meet the harvest allocation for a given marine species managed under a quota.

Notification of changes to public. For all such changes identified in subsection (a) of this section, the director shall provide notification via a dedicated phone line, electronic notification to dealers, listserv, and website posting. At least three (3) of these notifications shall occur a minimum of forty-eight (48) hours prior to the date that the change is to be effective.

Record of change. For all such changes identified in subsection (a) of this section, the director shall certify the record of the change, maintain the record, and make it available for public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 193, § 1.

20-1-13.
Publication and effective date of seasons and bag limits.

Notice of the director’s intention to adopt regulations pursuant to §

20-1-12

and the holding of a public hearing on these regulations shall be published in at least one newspaper of general statewide circulation, not less than twenty (20) days prior to the date of the public hearing. These regulations shall remain in effect not longer than one year following the date of their effectiveness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-14.
Control of fishing in Wallum Lake, Central Pond, and the James V. Turner Reservoir.

The director may make suitable rules and regulations governing fishing in Wallum Lake in Burrillville and Central Pond and the James V. Turner Reservoir in East Providence, and for this purpose, may confer with the Division of Fisheries and Wildlife in the department of Natural Resources of the commonwealth of Massachusetts concerning the fishing privileges of residents of Massachusetts in those bodies of water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-15.
Entry of private property.

The director of environmental management, and each duly authorized employee of that department, may, in the discharge of duties under this title, enter upon and pass over private property without liability for trespass. If feasible, the employee shall give notice to the property owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-16.
Penalty for violations.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the violation of any law or rule or regulation relating to wild animals, wild birds, lobsters and fish, marine, freshwater and anadromous fisheries and shellfisheries shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment for up to ninety (90) days, or both.

Striped bass penalties. Any person, firm, or corporation shall be fined in accordance with the following schedule:

First offense. Upon conviction, not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each striped bass taken, possessed, sold or possessed, and/or offered for sale and imprisonment for up to ninety (90) days, or both.

Second offense. Upon conviction, not less than two hundred dollars ($200) for each striped bass taken, possessed, sold or possessed, and/or offered for sale and imprisonment for up to ninety (90) days, or both; and any boat, fishing tackle or other implements used in violation shall be subject to forfeiture to the state.

Third and subsequent offenses. Upon conviction, not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each striped bass taken, possessed, sold or possessed, and/or offered for sale and imprisonment for up to ninety (90) days, or both; and any boat, fishing tackle or other implements used in this violation shall be subject to forfeiture to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 369, § 1.

20-1-17.
Cooperation with other states.

The director may cooperate with the fish and wildlife commissioners or other similar bodies or agencies of other states in carrying out the purpose of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-18.
Collector’s permits.

Notwithstanding any other restriction or prohibition set forth in this title or in §§

11-47-20

and

11-47-51

, the director is authorized to issue special permits for the taking, handling, and/or possession of any species of wild animal, of any size, age, and numbers as may be appropriate to persons for the purpose of study or management of wildlife populations, carrying out scientific experiments, and cultivation projects for which the director has responsibility. The director may require an applicant to provide any information that the director deems necessary to ascertain that there is scientific or ecological value in a bona fide experiment or project request. Failure to abide by the provisions of any permit, or failure to report any information required by the director, shall be cause for suspension or revocation of the permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 496, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 517, § 1.

20-1-19.
Powers of enforcement of officers in waters between states.

If and when the states of New York and Connecticut and the commonwealth of Massachusetts, or any of them, shall enact similar laws for the arrest and punishment for violations of the conservation or fish laws of this state or the state so enacting the similar law, committed, or attempted to be committed, by any person, or persons, fishing in waters lying between the states, any wildlife protector, fish warden, or other person of either state who is authorized to make arrests for violations of the conservation or fish laws of that state shall have power and authority to make arrest on any part of the waters between the states, or the shores thereof, and to take any person, or persons, so arrested for trial to the state in which the violation was committed and there to prosecute the person, or persons, according to the laws of that state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-20.
Power to require reports.

When deemed necessary to carry out the director’s duties under this title, the director may require that reports detailing hunt, catch, effort, and other data be provided to the director by any person who hunts or fishes in this state or who lands his or her catch in this state. These individual reports and other data shall remain confidential and may only be disseminated to the public or persons outside the department in a statistical format.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-21.
General powers.

The following fees shall be established and paid to the department of environmental management for issuance of the following special permits:

Ferret Permit
$10.00

Scientific Collector’s Permit
$25.00

Any fees collected under authority of this section shall be deposited into restricted receipt accounts established by this title, as appropriate to the type of special permit issued, and shall be used only for the authorized purposes of the restricted receipt accounts. The accounts include, but are not limited to: fishing license account, hunting license account, wildlife fund.

The divisions of fish and wildlife and marine fisheries shall be authorized to establish fees for reference, educational, and souvenir-type materials provided upon request to interested parties. Those materials include, but are not limited to: surveys, guides, maps, posters, reference and educational booklets and materials, and articles of clothing. No fee shall be required for any materials describing or implementing any licensing or regulatory authority of the divisions. Any fees collected under authority of this section shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 54; P.L. 2001, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 2.

20-1-22.
Severability.

The provisions of this title shall be interpreted and construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose. If any provision of any of the chapters in this title, or any rule or regulation issued under this title, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the title and rules and regulations shall not be affected, but shall be construed in such a way as to give all the provisions of this title full and valid effect to the fullest extent consistent with the law. The invalidity of any section or parts of any section shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-1-23.
[Reserved.]

20-1-24.
Wildlife Damage Act.

For purposes of this section, “wildlife population” includes, but is not limited to: deer, indigenous Canadian geese, mute swans, cormorants, wild turkeys, crows, coyotes, and furbearers.

The department of environmental management shall establish a program of financial assistance to farmers, when state or federal funds become available, for the purpose of establishing preventive practices to protect damage to crops by wildlife. The director of the department is authorized and empowered to establish rules and regulations to enforce the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 402, § 1.

20-1-25.
Internet hunting.

“Internet hunting” means the use of the internet to remotely control the shooting of any bird or animal.

No person shall shoot at or kill any bird or animal with any gun via an internet connection in Rhode Island.

No person shall import, export, or possess any bird or animal, or any part thereof, that has been taken by the use of the internet to remotely control the shooting of any bird or animal.

Violations of this section shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment for up to ninety (90) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 594, § 1.

20-1-26.
Freshwater invasive aquatic plants — Prohibition on importation and possession.

No person shall import, transport, disperse, distribute, introduce, sell, purchase, or possess in the state any species of non-native (exotic) freshwater invasive aquatic plants, as defined by the director. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability. The prohibition and its enforcement shall not become effective until the rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability take effect.

Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 194, § 1.

20-1-27.
Exotic invasive freshwater fish and invertebrate species — Prohibition on liberation into freshwaters.

No person shall release or liberate, by design or accident, any species of non-native (exotic) fish or invertebrate, as defined by the director, into the freshwater lakes, ponds, rivers, streams, or wetlands of the state. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability. The prohibition and its enforcement shall not become effective until the rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability take effect.

Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 182, § 1.

20-1-28.
Regulation of exotic baitfish — Prohibition on importation, sale and transport of exotic baitfish species.

No person shall import, transport, culture, or sell exotic species of baitfish, as specified by the director, in Rhode Island. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability. The regulations shall include a list of approved native baitfish and a list of prohibited non-native or exotic species. The prohibition and its enforcement shall not become effective until the rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability take effect.

Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 182, § 1.

20-1-29.
Trade in shark fins.

For the purpose of this section:

“Shark” means any species of the subclass Elasmobranchii; it does not include smooth dogfish (smooth hounds), spiny dogfish, or species in the suborder Batoidea;

“Shark fin” means the raw, dried, or otherwise processed detached fin or the raw, dried, or otherwise processed detached tail of a shark.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall possess, sell, offer for sale, trade, or distribute a shark fin.

A person who holds a license or permit to take or land sharks may separate a shark fin from a lawfully landed shark during the ordinary course of preparing the body of the shark for consumption, sale, trade, or distribution; provided, however, that a shark fin so separated from the shark shall be immediately destroyed unless used by the person for the purposes of taxidermy and subsequent display.

The director of the department of environmental management may issue a permit for the possession of a shark fin to a person conducting noncommercial, scientific research.

Any shark fin seized by the director of the department of environmental management, or the director’s agents, through the enforcement of this section shall be destroyed.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred ($500) dollars, nor more than one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment; provided, however, that each shark fin possessed, sold, offered for sale, traded, or distributed in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense. Provided further, a violation of this section by a person holding a commercial or recreational license or permit pursuant to this chapter shall result in the suspension or revocation of such license or permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 70, § 1.